Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.170

Issuance or amendment of marketing order—Assent—Rules.

If the director determines that the requisite assent has been given to issue or amend a marketing order, the issuance or amendment shall be adopted by rule by the director within thirty days of the validation of the vote. If the director determines that the requisite assent has not been given no further action shall be taken by the director upon the proposal, and the order contained in the final decision shall be without force or effect.

[ 2002 c 313 s 11; 1987 c 393 s 6; 1961 c 256 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.